Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-4325
Director; enforcement of act; inspections; testing; methods of analysis; results; distribution.

(1) To enforce the Agricultural Liming Materials Act or the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to the act, the director may:

(a) For purposes of inspection, enter any location, vehicle, or both in which agricultural liming materials are manufactured, processed, packed, transported, or held for distribution during normal business hours, except that in the event such locations and vehicles are not open to the public, the director shall present his or her credentials and obtain consent before making entry thereto unless a search warrant has previously been obtained. Credentials shall not be required for each entry made during the period covered by the inspection. The person in charge of the location or vehicle shall be notified of the completion of the inspection. If the owner of such location or vehicle or his or her agent refuses to admit the director to inspect pursuant to this section, the director may obtain a search warrant from a court of competent jurisdiction directing such owner or agent to submit the location, vehicle, or both as described in such search warrant to inspection;

(b) Inspect any location or vehicle described in this subsection, all pertinent equipment, finished and unfinished materials, containers and labeling, all records, books, papers, and documents relating to the distribution and production of agricultural liming materials, and other information necessary for the enforcement of the act;

(c) Obtain samples of agricultural liming materials. The owner, operator, or agent in charge shall be given a receipt describing the samples obtained; and

(d) Make analyses of and test samples obtained pursuant to subdivision (c) of this subsection to determine whether such agricultural liming materials are in compliance with the act.

For purposes of this subsection, location shall include a factory, warehouse, or establishment.

(2) Sampling and analysis shall be conducted in accordance with methods published by the AOAC International or in accordance with other generally recognized methods.

(3) The results of official analyses of agricultural liming materials and portions of official samples shall be distributed by the department as provided in the rules and regulations.

Laws 1981, LB 396, § 25;

Laws 1983, LB 539, § 9;

Laws 1992, LB 366, § 6;

Laws 1993, LB 267, § 1.